Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-559
Notice; forgery; penalty.

Any person who shall forge or, without authority, sign any notice, provided for under sections 60-507 to 60-509, that a policy or bond is in effect, or any evidence of proof of financial responsibility, or who files or offers for filing any such notice or evidence of proof knowing or having reason to believe that it is forged or signed without authority, shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 59, p. 502;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 86.